Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1486
Registration of lobbyists; period valid.

The registration of a lobbyist shall be valid for a period commencing with the filing of any registration as required by section 49-1480 and ending at the end of the calendar year for which the lobbyist registered unless the registration is renewed as provided by section 49-1480.01 or the registration is terminated prior to the end of the calendar year in the manner prescribed by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 86;

Laws 1977, LB 4, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 9;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 34.